Arkansas, session 2025, SB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND. There is
hereby established for the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the
Blind for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U030U BLIND SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT 1 GRADE SE01
(2) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
*KMW013*
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
(3) L042C SCHOOL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 1 GRADE MP01
(4) E004C SCHOOL PRINCIPAL 2 GRADE GS11
(5) L040C DIETARY SERVICES DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS09
(6) E024C TEACHER SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS09
(7) E035C CERTIFIED MASTERS TEACHER 33 GRADE GS08
(8) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(9) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(10) S009C ASD/ASB TRANSPORTATION SERVICES COORD 1 GRADE GS06
(11) E044C CERTIFIED BACHELORS TEACHER 2 GRADE GS06
(12) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 2 GRADE GS06
(13) M064C RESIDENTIAL ACTIVITIES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(14) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 2 GRADE GS05
(15) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(16) S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(17) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS04
(18) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
(19) C058C EDUCATION PARAPROFESSIONAL 12 GRADE GS03
(20) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(21) V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS03
(22) M074C RESIDENTIAL ADVISOR 9 GRADE GS03
(23) S068C FOOD PREPARATION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS02
(24) S086C COOK 6 GRADE GS01
(25) S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT 4 GRADE GS01
(26) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 95

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Blind
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: seventeen (17) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
BLIND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the School for the Blind Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the
Blind - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $4,299,941
(02) EXTRA HELP 25,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,690,455
(04) OVERTIME 10,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,419,747
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 21,329
(C) PROF. FEES 96,308
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 1,200,000
(07) VOCATIONAL WORKSTUDY 10,000
(08) SUMMER PROJECTS 25,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,847,780

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Education - Arkansas School for the Blind - Federal Operations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $72,405
(02) EXTRA HELP 30,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 26,614
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 732,603
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 60,000
(C) PROF. FEES 164,171
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 85,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,170,793

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CASH OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for operating
expenses of the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Blind -
Cash Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $211,508
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 23,000
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 125,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $559,508

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - BRAILLE AND LARGE PRINT TEXTBOOKS - ARKANSAS
SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Education, to be payable from the School for the Blind Fund Account, for
purchasing, copying, and shipping braille and large print textbooks for the
blind and visually impaired students attending public schools in Arkansas by
the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Blind - Braille and
Large Print Textbooks for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BRAILLE AND LARGE PRINT TEXTBOOKS $223,024
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75

SECTION 7. REGULAR SALARIES - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF. There is
hereby established for the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the
Deaf for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U029U DEAF SCHOOL SUPERINTENDENT 1 GRADE SE01
(2) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE MP02
(3) L045C AUDIOLOGIST 1 GRADE MP01
(4) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
(5) L042C SCHOOL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 5 GRADE MP01
(6) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(7) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT03
(8) E004C SCHOOL PRINCIPAL 1 GRADE GS11
(9) E017C ASST PRINCIPAL 1 GRADE GS10
(10) E013C EDUCATION PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(11) E036C CERTIFIED MASTERS DEGREE LIBRARIAN 1 GRADE GS09
(12) L040C DIETARY SERVICES DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS09
(13) E022C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(14) E025C EDUCATIONAL SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS09
(15) E015C SPECIAL EDUCATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(16) E035C CERTIFIED MASTERS TEACHER 34 GRADE GS08
(17) M088C LICENSED MASTER SOCIAL WORKER 1 GRADE GS08
(18) M020C LICENSED PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR 1 GRADE GS08
(19) E029C SIGN LANGUAGE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(20) E032C EDUCATION COUNSELOR 2 GRADE GS07
(21) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(22) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(23) M024C RESIDENTIAL SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(24) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 2 GRADE GS06
(25) M064C RESIDENTIAL ACTIVITIES SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS05
(26) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 2 GRADE GS05
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
(27) S038C TRANSIT OPERATIONS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(28) V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS05
(29) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
(30) L078C FAMILY SERVICES ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS04
(31) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(32) S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(33) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS04
(34) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 5 GRADE GS03
(35) L082C CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS03
(36) C058C EDUCATION PARAPROFESSIONAL 19 GRADE GS03
(37) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(38) C053C MEDICAL RECORDS TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS03
(39) M074C RESIDENTIAL ADVISOR 21 GRADE GS03
(40) S068C FOOD PREPARATION COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS02
(41) S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS02
(42) S086C COOK 7 GRADE GS01
(43) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 3 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 140

SECTION 8. EXTRA HELP - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Deaf
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: fifty-five (55) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from the School for the Deaf Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the
Deaf - State Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $6,732,040
(02) EXTRA HELP 95,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,631,059
(04) OVERTIME 25,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,752,763
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 15,000
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 50,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 1,519,627
(07) VOCATIONAL WORKSTUDY 10,000
(08) MISCELLANEOUS ACTIVITIES 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $12,865,489

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - FEDERAL OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR
THE DEAF. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to
be payable from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department
of Education - Arkansas School for the Deaf - Federal Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $55,000
(02) EXTRA HELP 39,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 28,832
(04) OVERTIME 8,393
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 627,417
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 60,000
(C) PROF. FEES 245,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 90,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,153,642
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - CASH OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE
DEAF. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Education, to be
payable from cash funds as defined by Arkansas Code §19-4-801, for operating
expenses of the Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Deaf - Cash
Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $228,136
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 26,864
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 45,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $375,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - STUDENT NEEDS AND CAMPUS ENHANCEMENTS -
ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Education, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in the
State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
student needs and campus enhancements of the Department of Education -
Arkansas School for the Deaf - Student Needs and Campus Enhancements for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STUDENT NEEDS AND CAMPUS ENHANCEMENTS $250,000

SECTION 13. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND - TRANSFER PROVISION. Upon approval from the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Arkansas School for the Blind shall
transfer appropriation from the Summer Projects line item, in the State
Operations Appropriation of this Act, to the Regular Salaries, Extra Help,
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
Personal Services Matching, Overtime and Maintenance & General Operations
line items in the State Operations Appropriation of this Act, to compensate
staff who work during the summer months on summer projects, and to cover
other expenses of summer project activities. The Summer Projects line item
may also be used for the annual cost related to the compensation of eligible
staff for shift differential pay as well as compensation of employees for
performance of duties assigned as referenced in the Special Allowance Special
Language Section of this Act. Such additional compensation shall not be
construed as exceeding the maximum salary authorized for said employees.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ADE - ASB/ASD - SUMMER SCHOOL EMPLOYEES. Employees who, in addition to
working during the regular school term, also work during summer months shall
be authorized as additional compensation an amount not to exceed 1/12 of
their annual salary for each month or part thereof worked. Such additional
compensation shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum salary
authorized for said employees. Payment of additional compensation shall be
limited to employees in the following classifications:
CLASS CODE SUMMER SCHOOL POSITIONS GRADE
E044C Certified Bachelor's Teacher GS06
M026C Licensed Social Worker GS07
M020C Licensed Professional Counselor GS08
E035C Certified Masters Teacher GS08
M088C Licensed Master Social Worker GS08
E024C Teacher Supervisor GS09
E025C Educational Specialist GS09
E017C Assistant Principal GS10
E026C Education & Instruction Coordinator GS08
E015C Special Education Supervisor GS09
Exempt employees who require job responsibilities less than 2080 hours may
work during summer months with approval from school Superintendent. Said
employees shall be authorized as additional compensation an amount not to
exceed 1/12 of their annual salary for each month or part thereof worked.
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
Such additional compensation shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum
salary authorized for said employees.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD OF FUNDS - ASB.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause to be
transferred on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and Auditor
of State the balance of General Revenue funds remaining in the School for the
Blind Fund Account on June 30, 2024 2025 into a sub-fund created within the
School for the Blind Fund Account to be used for special maintenance,
renovations, or future construction projects of the Department of Education -
Arkansas School for the Blind.
(b) Any carry forward of the unexpended balance of funding as
authorized herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) The Office of Budget of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall report to the Legislative Council all amounts carried
forward by the September meeting of the Legislative Council or the Joint
Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the agency,
board, commission, or institution and the amount of funding carried forward,
the program name or line item and the funding source; and
(2) The Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Blind
shall provide a written report to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee containing all information set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this
section no later than thirty (30) days prior to the time the Department
presents its budget request to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee, or both; and
(3) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in subdivision (b)(2) of this section in the
budget manuals.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF - TRANSFER PROVISION. Upon approval from the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Arkansas School for the Deaf shall
transfer appropriation from the Miscellaneous Activities line item in the
State Operations Appropriation of this Act, to the Regular Salaries, Extra
Help, Personal Service Matching, Overtime, and Maintenance and General
Operations line items also in the State Operations Appropriation, to
compensate staff who work during the summer months on summer projects and to
cover other expenses of summer project activities. The Miscellaneous
Activities line item may also be used for the annual cost related to the
payment of contracted interpreter services, compensation of eligible staff
for shift differential pay, and compensation of employees for performance of
duties assigned as referenced in the Special Allowance Special Language of
this Act. Such additional compensation shall not be construed as exceeding
the maximum salary authorized for said employees.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CARRY FORWARD OF FUNDS - ASD.
(a) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause to be
transferred on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and Auditor
of State the balance of General Revenue funds remaining in the School for the
Deaf Fund Account on June 30, 2024 2025 into a sub-fund created within the
School for the Deaf Fund Account to be used for special maintenance,
renovations, or future construction projects of the Department of Education -
Arkansas School for the Deaf.
(b) Any carry forward of the unexpended balance of funding as
authorized herein, may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) The Office of Budget of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall report to the Legislative Council all amounts carried
forward by the September meeting of the Legislative Council or the Joint
Budget Committee meeting which report shall include the name of the agency,
board, commission, or institution and the amount of funding carried forward,
the program name or line item and the funding source; and
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
(2) The Department of Education - Arkansas School for the Deaf
shall provide a written report to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee containing all information set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this
section no later than thirty (30) days prior to the time the Department
presents its budget request to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee, or both; and
(3) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in subdivision (b)(2) of this section in the
budget manuals.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 18. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 19. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 20. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013

As Engrossed: S2/24/25 SB75
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee




























02-24-2025 14:52:51 KMW013